Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB337.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of a gun vault, gun safe, gun locker, gun cabinet, trigger lock, handgun vault, handgun locker, gun cable lock, gun lever lock, handgun safe, locking 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 gun case with key or combination lock or a device which does not allow use of the firearm without a key or combination.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0337PN0273 - 2 - 123